Virginia statutes. Title 5.1. Aviation.
Article 1. General Provisions.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

2C M.J. Aviation, §§

1-3

, 8.

§ 5.1-1.
(Effective until September 1, 2025) Definitions.

When used in this title, unless expressly stated otherwise:

“Aircraft”
means any contrivance now known, or hereafter invented, used, or designed for navigation of or flight in the air, including a balloon or other contrivance designed for maneuvering in airspace at an altitude greater than 24 inches above ground or water level, except that any contrivance now or hereafter invented of fixed or flexible wing design, operating without the assistance of any motor, engine, or other mechanical propulsive device, which is designed to utilize the feet and legs of the operator or operators as the sole means of initiating and sustaining forward motion during the launch and of providing the point of contact with the ground upon landing and commonly called a “hang glider” shall not be included within this definition.

“Aircraft based in this Commonwealth”
means an aircraft that is either (i) domiciled in a county, city, or town in the Commonwealth or (ii) parked in a county, city, or town in the Commonwealth when not in flight for the period of time specified in § 5.1-5.

“Airman”
means any individual, including the person in command and any pilot, mechanic, or member of the crew, who engages in the navigation of aircraft while under way within Virginia airspace; any individual who is directly in charge of the inspection, maintenance, overhauling, or repair of aircraft, aircraft engines, propellers, or accessories; and any individual who serves in the capacity of aircraft dispatcher.

“Air navigation facility”
means any airport ground or air navigation facility, other than one owned and operated by the United States, used in, available for use in, or designed for use in aid of air navigation, including any structures, buildings, mechanisms, lights, beacons, markers, communicating systems, or other instrumentalities or devices, and any combination of any or all of such facilities, used or useful as an aid, or constituting any advantage or convenience, to the safe taking off, navigation, and landing of aircraft; in the safe and efficient operation or maintenance of an airport; in the safe, efficient and convenient handling or processing of aviation passengers, mail or cargo; or in the servicing or maintenance of aircraft or ground equipment.

“Airport”
means any area of land or water which is used, or intended for public use, for the landing and takeoff of aircraft, and any appurtenant areas that are used, or intended for use, for airport buildings or other airport facilities or rights-of-way, easements and together with all airport buildings and facilities located thereon.

“Airport hazard”
means any structure, object or natural growth, or use of land that obstructs the airspace required for the flight of aircraft in landing or taking off at an airport or is otherwise hazardous to such landing or taking off of aircraft.

“Airspace”
means all that space above the land and waters within the boundary of the Commonwealth.

“Board”
means the Virginia Aviation Board.

“Civil aircraft”
means any aircraft other than a public aircraft.

“Commercial aircraft”
means any civil aircraft used in flight activity for compensation or for hire.

“Contract carrier by aircraft”
or

“contract carrier”

means any person not included under the definitions of “common carrier by aircraft” or “restricted common carrier by aircraft” as defined in § 5.1-89 who, under special and individual contracts or agreements, and whether directly or by a lease or any other arrangement, transports passengers or property by aircraft for compensation and in the transportation of passengers does not charge individual fares.

“Department”
means the Department of Aviation.

“Drop zone”
means any locality whether over land or water that is used, or intended for use, for the landing and recovery of sky divers or parachutists using a parachute or other contrivance designed for sport jumping.

“Fighter or attack jet”
means a jet-powered aircraft designed for military (i) combat training or (ii) operational mission execution.

“Landing area”
or

“landing field”

means any locality, whether over land or water, including airports and intermediate landing fields, which is used or intended to be used for the landing and takeoff of aircraft and open to the public for such use, whether or not facilities are provided for the sheltering, servicing, or repair of aircraft or for receiving or discharging passengers or cargo.

“Person”
means any individual, corporation, government, political subdivision of the Commonwealth, or governmental subdivision or agency, business trust, estate, trust, partnership, two or more of any of the foregoing having a joint or common interest, or any other legal or commercial entity.

“Public aircraft”
means an aircraft used exclusively in the service of any state, or political subdivision thereof, or the federal government. “Public aircraft” includes any fighter or attack jet that is leased or owned by a private entity, provided that the aircraft operations are conducted exclusively for the purpose of military combat training in service to the federal government.

History.

Code 1950, §

5-1

; 1966, c. 576; 1970, c. 717; 1975, c. 561; 1979, c. 272; 1980, c. 721; 1988, c. 588; 2011, c. 809; 2018, cc. 357, 441.

Editor’s note.

At its regular session of 1964 the General Assembly directed the Virginia Code Commission to revise certain titles of the Code, including Title 5, relating to aviation, and in July, 1965, the Commission sent to the Governor and General Assembly its report containing the proposed revision of Title 5, which was published as House Document 2 of the 1966 session. The Code Commission’s draft of the revision, as amended by the General Assembly, became chapter 576 of the Acts of 1966. Effective July 1, 1966, it repealed Title 5 and enacted in lieu thereof a new Title 5.1.

Some of the cases cited in the notes under the various sections of this title were decided under corresponding provisions of Title 5.

Acts 1966, c. 576, clauses 3-6, provide as follows:

“3. All acts and parts of acts, all sections of the Code of Virginia, and all provisions of municipal charters inconsistent with the provisions of this act are, except as otherwise provided, repealed to the extent of such inconsistency.

“4. The repeal of Title 5 effective as of July 1, 1966, shall not affect any act or offense done or committed, or any penalty or forfeiture incurred, or any right established, accrued or accruing on or before such date, or any prosecution, suit or action pending on that date. Except as in this act otherwise provided, neither the repeal of Title 5 of the Code of Virginia nor the enactment of Title 5.1 shall apply to offenses committed prior to July 1, 1966, and prosecutions for such offenses shall be governed by the prior law, which is continued in effect for that purpose. For the purposes of this act, an offense was committed prior to July 1, 1966 if any of the essential elements of the offense occurred prior thereto.

“5. Whenever in Title 5.1 any of the conditions, requirements, provisions or contents of any section, article or chapter of Title 5, as such title existed prior to July 1, 1966, are transferred in the same or in modified form to a new section, article or chapter of Title 5.1, and whenever any such former section, article or chapter of Title 5 is given a new number in Title 5.1, all references to any such former section, article or chapter of Title 5 appearing elsewhere in the Code of Virginia than in Title 5.1 shall be construed to apply to the new or renumbered section, article or chapter containing such conditions, requirements, provisions or contents or portions thereof.

“6. It is the intention of the General Assembly that this act shall be liberally construed to effect the purposes set out herein, and if any clause, sentence, paragraph or section of this act shall ever be declared unconstitutional, it shall be deemed severable, and the remainder of this act shall continue in full force and effect.”

Chapter 717 of the Acts of 1966 provides: “Whenever, during the regular session of the General Assembly of Virginia of nineteen hundred sixty-six there shall have been enacted any statute purporting to revise, rearrange, amend and recodify any title of the Code of Virginia, such statute shall be deemed to have been enacted prior in time to any other statute enacted at such session adding to, repealing or amending and reenacting any portion of such title; and every such other statute shall be deemed to have so added to, repealed or amended and reenacted, as the case may be, such title as so revised, rearranged, amended and recodified; provided, however, that effect shall be given to any such other, or subsequent, statute only to the extent of any apparent changes in the law as it existed prior to such session.”

Acts
2018, c. 441, cl. 2, as amended by Acts
2022, c. 136, cl. 1 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall expire on
July 1, 2025.”

Acts 2018, cc. 357 and 441, cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall expire on July 1, 2025.”

The 2011 amendments.

The 2011 amendment by c. 809 rewrote the section.

The 2018 amendments.

The 2018 amendments by cc. 357 and 441 are identical, expire July 1, 2025, and added the definition for “Fighter or attack jet”; and in the definition for “Public aircraft,” added the second sentence. For expiration date, see Editor’s note.

Law Review.

For survey of Virginia law on administrative law and utility regulation for the year 1978-1979, see 66 Va. L. Rev. 193 (1980).

For an article, “Thou Canst Not Fly High With Borrowed Wings: Airline Finance and Bankruptcy Code Section 110,” see 8 Geo. Mason L. Rev. 41 (1999).

§ 5.1-1.
(Effective September 1, 2025) Definitions.

When used in this title, unless expressly stated otherwise:

“Aircraft”
means any contrivance now known, or hereafter invented, used, or designed for navigation of or flight in the air, including a balloon or other contrivance designed for maneuvering in airspace at an altitude greater than 24 inches above ground or water level, except that any contrivance now or hereafter invented of fixed or flexible wing design, operating without the assistance of any motor, engine, or other mechanical propulsive device, which is designed to utilize the feet and legs of the operator or operators as the sole means of initiating and sustaining forward motion during the launch and of providing the point of contact with the ground upon landing and commonly called a “hang glider” shall not be included within this definition.

“Aircraft based in this Commonwealth”
means an aircraft that is either (i) domiciled in a county, city, or town in the Commonwealth or (ii) parked in a county, city, or town in the Commonwealth when not in flight for the period of time specified in § 5.1-5.

“Airman”
means any individual, including the person in command and any pilot, mechanic, or member of the crew, who engages in the navigation of aircraft while under way within Virginia airspace; any individual who is directly in charge of the inspection, maintenance, overhauling, or repair of aircraft, aircraft engines, propellers, or accessories; and any individual who serves in the capacity of aircraft dispatcher.

“Air navigation facility”
means any airport ground or air navigation facility, other than one owned and operated by the United States, used in, available for use in, or designed for use in aid of air navigation, including any structures, buildings, mechanisms, lights, beacons, markers, communicating systems, or other instrumentalities or devices, and any combination of any or all of such facilities, used or useful as an aid, or constituting any advantage or convenience, to the safe taking off, navigation, and landing of aircraft; in the safe and efficient operation or maintenance of an airport; in the safe, efficient and convenient handling or processing of aviation passengers, mail or cargo; or in the servicing or maintenance of aircraft or ground equipment.

“Airport”
means any area of land or water which is used, or intended for public use, for the landing and takeoff of aircraft, and any appurtenant areas that are used, or intended for use, for airport buildings or other airport facilities or rights-of-way, easements and together with all airport buildings and facilities located thereon.

“Airport hazard”
means any structure, object or natural growth, or use of land that obstructs the airspace required for the flight of aircraft in landing or taking off at an airport or is otherwise hazardous to such landing or taking off of aircraft.

“Airspace”
means all that space above the land and waters within the boundary of the Commonwealth.

“Board”
means the Virginia Aviation Board.

“Civil aircraft”
means any aircraft other than a public aircraft.

“Commercial aircraft”
means any civil aircraft used in flight activity for compensation or for hire.

“Contract carrier by aircraft”
or

“contract carrier”

means any person not included under the definitions of “common carrier by aircraft” or “restricted common carrier by aircraft” as defined in § 5.1-89 who, under special and individual contracts or agreements, and whether directly or by a lease or any other arrangement, transports passengers or property by aircraft for compensation and in the transportation of passengers does not charge individual fares.

“Department”
means the Department of Aviation.

“Drop zone”
means any locality whether over land or water that is used, or intended for use, for the landing and recovery of sky divers or parachutists using a parachute or other contrivance designed for sport jumping.

“Landing area”
or

“landing field”

means any locality, whether over land or water, including airports and intermediate landing fields, which is used or intended to be used for the landing and takeoff of aircraft and open to the public for such use, whether or not facilities are provided for the sheltering, servicing, or repair of aircraft or for receiving or discharging passengers or cargo.

“Person”
means any individual, corporation, government, political subdivision of the Commonwealth, or governmental subdivision or agency, business trust, estate, trust, partnership, two or more of any of the foregoing having a joint or common interest, or any other legal or commercial entity.

“Public aircraft”
means an aircraft used exclusively in the service of any state, or political subdivision thereof, or the federal government.

History.

Code 1950, §

5-1

; 1966, c. 576; 1970, c. 717; 1975, c. 561; 1979, c. 272; 1980, c. 721; 1988, c. 588; 2011, c. 809.

§ 5.1-1.1.
Creation of Department of Aviation.

There is hereby created a Department of Aviation.

History.

1979, c. 272; 1984, c. 720.

§ 5.1-1.2.
Appointment of Director; term; vacancies.

The Department shall be under the direction of a director, hereinafter referred to in this title as “Director,” who shall be appointed by the Governor, subject to confirmation by the General Assembly if in session when such appointment is made, and, if not in session, then at its next succeeding session. He shall hold his office at the pleasure of the Governor for a term coincident with that of each Governor making the appointment or until his successor shall be appointed and qualified. Vacancies shall be filled for the unexpired term in the same manner as original appointments are made.

History.

1979, c. 272.

§ 5.1-1.3.
Oath and bond of Director; salary.

The Director, before entering upon the discharge of his duties, shall take an oath that he will faithfully and impartially discharge and perform all the duties of his office, and he shall be bonded in accordance with §

2.2-1840

. The Director shall receive such salary as may be appropriated for the purpose.

History.

1979, c. 272; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 152.

The 2021 Sp. Sess. I amendments.

The 2021 amendment by Sp. Sess. I, c. 152, effective July 1, 2021, substituted “be bonded in accordance with §

2.2-1840

” for “give bond in such penalty as may be fixed by the Governor, conditioned upon the faithful discharge of his duties” in the first sentence, and deleted the former second sentence, which read: “The premium on such bond shall be paid out of the funds available for the maintenance and operation of his office.”

§ 5.1-1.4.
Enforcement of laws, rules and regulations.

Except for the provisions of Chapter 9 (§ 5.1-89 et seq.) of this title, the Department shall have the authority to enforce any provision of this title and any rules and regulations promulgated by the Board in reference to aircraft, airfields, pilots and other similar subjects. Said rules and regulations, and enforcement actions taken in connection therewith, shall be in accordance with the substantive and procedural requirements of the Administrative Process Act, Chapter 40 (§

2.2-4000

et seq.) of Title 2.2.

History.

1979, c. 272; 2002, c. 94.

The 2002 amendments.

The 2002 amendment by c. 94 substituted “provisions of Chapter 9” for “provisions of Chapters 7 (§ 5.1-77 et seq.) and 9.”

Law Review.

For survey of Virginia administrative law and utility regulation for the year 1978-1979, see 66 Va. L. Rev. 193 (1980).

§ 5.1-1.5.
General powers of Department.

The Department shall have the following general powers:

To employ such personnel as may be required to carry out the purposes of this chapter.

To make and enter into all contracts and agreements necessary or incidental to the performance of its duties and the execution of its powers under this chapter, including, but not limited to, contracts with the United States, other states, agencies and governmental subdivisions of the Commonwealth.

To accept grants from the United States government and agencies and instrumentalities thereof and any other source. To these ends, the Department shall have the power to comply with such conditions and execute such agreements as may be necessary, convenient or desirable.

To do all acts necessary or convenient to carry out the purposes of this chapter.

History.

1979, c. 272.

§ 5.1-1.6.
Further powers and duties of Department; State Corporation Commission to administer Chapter 9.

The Department shall have the following powers and duties:

Administer the provisions of Chapters 1 (§ 5.1-1 et seq.), 3 (§ 5.1-31 et seq.), 5 (§ 5.1-51 et seq.) and 8.1 (§ 5.1-88.1 et seq.);

Plan for the development of a state aviation system;

Promote aviation in the Commonwealth in the interest of the public, including representing the interests of the Commonwealth before all tribunals, agencies or offices, federal, state and local, in any matter tending to affect any phase of Virginia aviation;

Register aircraft and license airports and landing areas; and

Provide assistance to cities, towns, counties and other governmental subdivisions for the planning, development, construction and operation of airports, landing fields and other aviation facilities.

The State Corporation Commission shall continue to administer Chapter 9 (§ 5.1-89 et seq.).

History.

1979, c. 272; 1991, c. 126; 1992, c. 108; 2017, c. 793.

The 2017 amendments.

The 2017 amendment by c. 793, in subdivision A 1, deleted “of this title” following “(§ 5.1-88.1 et seq.)”; in subdivision A 4, substituted “Register aircraft and license” for “License aircraft”; and in subsection B, deleted “of this title” following “(§ 5.1-89 et seq.).”

Law Review.

For survey of Virginia administrative law and utility regulation for the year 1978-1979, see 66 Va. L. Rev. 193 (1980).

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

2C M.J. Aviation, § 3.

§ 5.1-1.7.
Suits to enjoin violations of title.

The Department may seek to enjoin any act in violation of any provision of this title, or of any rule or regulation promulgated under any provision of this title, by application for injunctive relief to the circuit court of the jurisdiction where the violation occurs, which shall give priority on its docket to suits brought by the Department.

History.

1979, c. 272.

§ 5.1-2.
Repealed by Acts 1979, c. 272.

§ 5.1-2.1.
Virginia Aviation Commission continued as Virginia Aviation Board; membership; terms; Chairman.

The Virginia Aviation Commission, a public body corporate and politic, is hereby continued within the Department of Aviation as a political subdivision of the Commonwealth and shall hereafter be known as the Virginia Aviation Board. The Board shall consist of eight members, selected so far as practicable from different geographic areas of the Commonwealth, appointed by the Governor, subject to confirmation by the General Assembly, to serve at the pleasure of the Governor. Members shall serve for four-year terms and no member shall serve for more than two full successive terms. Initial appointments to the Board shall be made as follows: one shall be for a term of one year, two shall be for terms of two years, two shall be for terms of three years, and two shall be for terms of four years each and thereafter all appointments shall be for terms of four years each. The Chairman of the Board shall be appointed by the Governor.

Whenever the Board shall acquire ownership or jurisdiction over an airport or airports previously operated by an agency of the United States, there may be a member appointed to the Board by the President of the United States. Such member shall have the powers and duties of other members of the Board only with respect to the airport or airports so acquired.

There may be a member of the Board from any county or city wherein the Board acquires or constructs an airport, to be elected by the governing body of the county or city and to serve at its pleasure. Such member shall have the powers and duties of other members of the Board only with respect to such airport. If the Board acquires an airport which was constructed by one political subdivision but is located in another, the political subdivision which constructed the airport, rather than the political subdivision in which it is located, shall be represented on the Board.

History.

1979, c. 272; 1980, c. 750; 1985, c. 448.

Law Review.

For survey of Virginia law on administrative law and utility regulation for the year 1978-1979, see 66 Va. L. Rev. 193 (1980).

§ 5.1-2.2.
Powers and duties of Board.

The Board shall exercise the following powers and duties:

Provide a means of citizen access to the Department;

Provide a means of publicizing the policies and programs of the Department in order to educate the public and elicit public support for Department activities;

Monitor the policies and activities of the Department and have the right of access to departmental information;

Advise the Governor and the Director on matters relating to the Commonwealth’s aviation policies and programs;

Promulgate such rules and regulations relating to airports, landing fields and other aviation facilities, aircraft, and such other kindred matters and things as may be proper and necessary to promote and develop safe aviation practices and operations; and

Develop on behalf of the Department recommendations for distribution of funds to localities by the State Corporation Commission for aviation development through the end of the 1978-80 biennium, after which time the Board shall be responsible for the allocation on behalf of the Department of all such funds as provided in this act, which funds shall be distributed by the Department in accordance with such allocation.

History.

1979, c. 272; 1980, c. 306; 1984, c. 720; 2017, c. 793.

Editor’s note.

The words “this act” in subdivision 6 of this section refer to Acts 1979, c. 272, which enacted §§ 5.1-1.1 through 5.1-1.7 and amended former §§

2.1-1

, 2.1-51.24 and numerous sections throughout this title.

The 2017 amendments.

The 2017 amendment by c. 793, in subdivision 5, deleted “air traffic, construction and inspection of aircraft, qualifications and licensing of airmen, stunt flying” following “and other aviation facilities, aircraft.”

§ 5.1-2.2:1.
Further powers and duties of the Board.

The Board shall have all the powers necessary or convenient to carry out the purposes of this chapter including, but not limited to, the power:

To sue in its own name, to have a seal, and to have perpetual succession;

To execute such contracts and other instruments and take such other action as may be necessary or convenient to carry out the purposes of this chapter;

To plan, establish, develop, construct, enlarge, improve, maintain, equip, operate, regulate, and protect airports and air navigation facilities, within this Commonwealth and within any adjoining state, including the acquisition, construction, installation, equipment, maintenance, and operation at such airports of buildings and other facilities for the servicing of aircraft or for the comfort and accommodation of air travelers, and the purchase and sale of supplies, goods, and commodities as an incident to the operation of its airport properties. For such purposes the Board may, by purchase, gift, devise, lease, condemnation, or otherwise, acquire property, real or personal, or any interest therein, including easements in airport hazards or land outside the boundaries of an airport or airport site, as are necessary to permit the removal, elimination, obstruction marking or obstruction lighting of airport hazards or to prevent the establishment of airport hazards, or for the enlargement of an airport constructed or acquired under this subdivision 3; provided, however, such power of eminent domain shall not extend to the taking of any radio or television towers or installation in existence on June 27, 1958;

To acquire, by purchase, gift, devise, or lease, existing airports and air navigation facilities;

To establish or acquire and maintain airports in, over, and upon any public waters of this Commonwealth or any submerged lands under such public waters; and to construct and maintain terminal buildings, landing floats, causeways, roadways, and bridges for approaches to or connecting with any such airport, and landing floats and breakwaters for the protection thereof;

To construct, or permit the construction of, for sale or lease, on such terms and conditions as the Board may deem proper, industrial, commercial or recreational facilities and approaches thereto and appurtenances thereof, on any lands of the Board not acquired by eminent domain and not needed for operational use of an airport owned or operated by it; provided, that any such factory or manufacturing facility shall be so constructed as not to constitute an airport hazard. In the exercise of the powers conferred by this subdivision, the Board shall comply with any applicable zoning restrictions of the political subdivision in which any airport or facility is, or is proposed to be located.

History.

1980, c. 750.

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

Aviation Board may borrow money and issue note for infrastructure projects. —

If infrastructure projects fall within the context of constructing, enlarging, or improving an airport facility, the Aviation Board may enter into, execute, and deliver a loan agreement to borrow money and issue a note, subject to the receipt of appropriations or grants. See opinion of Attorney General to Mr. George P. Ramsey III, Chairman, Virginia Aviation Board, 01-032, 2001 Va. AG LEXIS 15 (3/23/01).

§ 5.1-2.2:2.
Commercial air service plan.

The Board shall develop and review every five years a commercial air service plan for commercial air service airports within the Commonwealth. In developing and reviewing such plan, the Board shall (i) analyze trends in commercial air service generally, (ii) analyze the current and projected future demographic and economic trends related to air travel needs in the Commonwealth, (iii) solicit input from other appropriate stakeholders, (iv) consider any other factors determined to be appropriate by the Board, and (v) establish reasonable goals for commercial air service based on clauses (i) through (iv).

In developing the plan pursuant to subsection A, the Board shall coordinate with each commercial air service airport.

Prior to the allocation of funds pursuant to §

33.2-1526.6

, the Board shall ensure that any requested funds are not inconsistent with the Board’s commercial air service plan and that no commercial service airport is penalized for not meeting goals set forth in such commercial air service plan.

History.

2017, c. 709; 2020, cc. 1230, 1275.

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendments by cc. 1230 and 1275 are identical and substituted “§

33.2-1526.6

” for “subdivision A 3 of §

58.1-638

” in subsection C.

§ 5.1-2.2:3.
Transparency and accountability in the use of Commonwealth Aviation Fund revenues.

By November 1 of each year, the Board shall report to the Governor and the General Assembly on the use of Commonwealth Aviation Fund revenues the previous fiscal year. The report shall include at a minimum the following:

The use of entitlement funds allocated pursuant to subdivision B 1 of §

33.2-1526.6

by each air carrier airport, including the amount of funds that are unobligated;

The award and use of discretionary funds allocated for air carrier and reliever airports pursuant to subdivision B 2 a (1) of §

33.2-1526.6

by every such airport;

The award and use of discretionary funds allocated for general aviation airports pursuant to subdivision B 2 a (2) of §

33.2-1526.6

by every such airport; and

The award and use of discretionary funds allocated for all airports pursuant to subdivision B 2 b of §

33.2-1526.6

by every such airport.Such report shall also include the status of ongoing projects funded in whole or in part by the Commonwealth Aviation Fund pursuant to § 33.2-1526.6.

Each year prior to the release of entitlement funds allocated pursuant to subdivision B 1 of §

33.2-1526.6

, each air carrier airport shall submit a plan that outlines the planned use of such funds for the upcoming fiscal year to the Board for review and approval. The Board shall approve such plan provided that the use of funds is in accordance with Board policies. An airport may modify its plan during a fiscal year by submitting a revised plan to the Board for review.

The Board shall have the right to withhold entitlement funds allocated pursuant to subdivision B 1 of §

33.2-1526.6

in the event that the entitlement utilization plan is not approved by the Board or the airport uses the funds in a manner that is inconsistent with the approved plan.

History.

2017, c. 709; 2018, c. 506; 2020, cc. 1230, 1275.

The 2018 amendments.

The 2018 amendment by c. 506, in subsection A, substituted “Commonwealth Airport Fund” for “Commercial Airport Fund”; in subdivision A 2, substituted “subdivision A 3 b 1 a” for “subdivision A 3 b”; in subdivision A 3, substituted “subdivision A 3 b 1 b” for “subdivision A 3 c”; added subdivision A 4; and made stylistic changes.

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendments by cc. 1230 and 1275 are identical, and substituted “Commonwealth Aviation Fund” for “Commonwealth Airport Fund” twice; and substituted references to “§

33.2-1526.6

” for references to “§

58.1-638

” throughout the section.

§ 5.1-2.2:4.
Transparency and accountability for use of Department and Board funds.

Any (i) airport board, commission, authority, or body established pursuant to § 5.1-31 or 5.1-36 or (ii) public use privately owned airport that has received funding from the Department or Board shall keep records of receipts and disbursements thereof, which records shall be open for audit and evaluation by the appropriate state authorities.

By August 1 of each year, any (i) airport board, commission, authority, or body established pursuant to § 5.1-31 or 5.1-36 or (ii) public use privately owned airport that has received or disbursed funds from the Department or Board within the prior fiscal year shall submit to the Department a report detailing the purpose for which such funds were received or disbursed. The report shall also list any localities from which such entity receives funds. The Department shall make such report available to the public upon request and shall post such report on the website for the Department. Sensitive financial, personal, or security information contained in the report may be redacted at the discretion of the Department prior to public release. The Department shall send such redacted report to the governing body of any locality from which such airport board, commission, authority, or body receives funds.

History.

2018, c. 430.

§ 5.1-2.3.
Meetings of Board; quorum.

The Board shall meet at least once every three months, and on the call of the Chairman, when in his opinion additional meetings are necessary. Four members of the Board shall constitute a quorum.

History.

1979, c. 272.

§ 5.1-2.4.
Repealed by Acts 1980, c. 728.

Cross references.

As to compensation and expenses of boards, commissions and similar bodies, see §

2.2-2813

.

§ 5.1-2.5.
Eminent domain; right of entry.

The Board is hereby vested with the power of eminent domain and may exercise the same for the purposes set forth in subdivision 3 of § 5.1-2.2:1 in the manner set forth in Chapter 2 (§

25.1-200

et seq.) of Title 25.1 and to the extent permitted to railroads by § 56-347; provided, however, such power of eminent domain shall not extend to the taking of any radio or television towers or installation in existence on June 27, 1958. If the owner, lessee or occupier of any property to be condemned or otherwise acquired shall refuse to remove his property therefrom or give up possession thereof, the Board may proceed to obtain possession in any manner provided by law. The authorized agents and employees may enter upon any lands, waters, and premises in the Commonwealth for the purpose of making surveys, soundings, drillings, and examinations as they may deem necessary or convenient for the purposes of this chapter, and such entry shall not be deemed a trespass, nor shall an entry for such purpose be deemed an entry under any condemnation proceedings that may be then pending. The Board shall make reimbursement for any actual damage resulting to such lands, waters, and premises as a result of such activities.

History.

1980, c. 750; 2003, c. 940.

Cross references.

As to application of this section, see § 5.1-2.24.

The 2003 amendments.

The 2003 amendment by c. 940, in the first sentence, inserted “set forth in Chapter 2 (§

25.1-200

et seq.) of Title 25.1,” and substituted “§ 56-347” for “Title 25,” and substituted “that” for “which” in the next-to-last sentence.

§ 5.1-2.6.
Disposal of airport, air navigation facility or other property.

Except as may be limited by the terms and conditions of any grant, loan or agreement authorized by § 5.1-2.16 the Board may, by sale, lease, or otherwise, dispose of any airport, air navigation facility, or other property, or portion thereof or interest therein, acquired pursuant to this chapter. Such disposal by sale, lease, or otherwise, shall be in accordance with the laws of this Commonwealth governing the disposition of other public property, except that in the case of disposal to another authority, a municipality or an agency of the Commonwealth or federal government for use and operation as a public airport, the sale, lease, or other disposal may be effected in such manner and upon such terms as the commissioners of the Board may deem in the best interest of aviation.

History.

1980, c. 750.